Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.578

Literacy supports—American Indian and Alaska Native students.

Beginning with the 2025-26 school year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide school districts and state-tribal education compact schools with program guidance, technical assistance, and professional learning to serve American Indian and Alaska Native students with appropriate, culturally affirming literacy supports.

[ 2024 c 202 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 202: See note following RCW 28A.300.577.